Illinois, session 104th, HB700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-101)7    Sec. 3-101. Creation of fund. In each municipality, as 8defined in Section 3-103, the the city council or the board of 9trustees, as the case may be, shall establish and administer a 10police pension fund, as prescribed in this Article, for the 11benefit of its police officers and of their surviving spouses, 12children, and certain other dependents. The duty of the 13corporate authorities of a municipality to establish and 14administer a police pension fund shall be suspended during any 15period during which the fund is dissolved under Section 163-144.6 of this Code. 17(Source: P.A. 97-99, eff. 1-1-12.)